Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,110.04
Examining board; meetings.

The examining board shall hold as many meetings throughout each year as may be necessary to conduct the business of the examining board and to examine, within a reasonable time, the applicants seeking licensure. An annual meeting of the examining board shall be held for the election of officers.

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 23.
September 1, 2024